test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-maadar_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:





  Noun - maadâr: # 2A
    maadâr+N+Sg+Nom: maadâr
    maadâr+N+Sg+Gen: maddâr
    maadâr+N+Sg+Acc: maddâr
    maadâr+N+Sg+Ill: maddârân
    maadâr+N+Sg+Loc: maddârist
    maadâr+N+Sg+Com: maddâráin
    maadâr+N+Sg+Abe: maddârttáá
    maadâr+N+Ess:    madârin
    maadâr+N+Par:    madârid
    maadâr+N+Pl+Nom: maddâreh
    maadâr+N+Pl+Gen: maddârij
    maadâr+N+Pl+Acc: maddârijd
    maadâr+N+Pl+Ill: maddâráid
    maadâr+N+Pl+Loc: maddârijn
    maadâr+N+Pl+Com: maddârijguin
    maadâr+N+Pl+Abe: maddârijttáá
   
